Hawaii, session 2026, HB433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that annual sustained funding for offender reentry services is critical to the public safety of the State's communities because the success of transitioning offenders reduces the cycle of recidivism.  Other jurisdictions, such as Pima County, Arizona, have implemented successful transition programs and reentry services that connect released offenders with treatment, housing, transportation, employment, and other services provided by community-based organizations.  The legislature further finds that access to reentry services such as community-based support services, benefits determination assistance, employment assistance, temporary clean and sober housing, mental health treatment, substance abuse treatment, and transitional housing is pivotal in determining the success or failure of reentry and reintegration into the community. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require the department of corrections and rehabilitation to submit an annual report to the legislature on the number of individuals released that received reentry services; and (2)  Appropriate funds to the department for reentry services to connect offenders with community-based services. SECTION 2.  The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall submit an annual report containing the number of individuals released that received reentry services to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, beginning with the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for reentry services to connect offenders with community-based services. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.